Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.070

Commercial pesticide applicator license—Requirements.

It is unlawful for any person to engage in the business of applying pesticides to the land of another without a commercial pesticide applicator license. Application for a commercial applicator license must be accompanied by a fee of two hundred forty-three dollars and in addition a fee of twenty-seven dollars for each apparatus, exclusive of one, used by the applicant in the application of pesticides.

[ 2021 c 244 s 8; 2008 c 285 s 21; 1997 c 242 s 11; 1994 c 283 s 6; 1993 sp.s. c 19 s 4; 1991 c 109 s 30; 1989 c 380 s 37; 1981 c 297 s 21; 1967 c 177 s 3; 1961 c 249 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 244: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Effective date—2008 c 285 ss 15-26: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Intent—Captions not law—2008 c 285: See notes following RCW 43.22.434.

Effective date—1997 c 242: See note following RCW 15.58.070.

Severability—1981 c 297: See note following RCW 15.36.201.